Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Bicentennial Commission

153.386.
Definition. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.388.
Kentucky Bicentennial Commission created — Appointment of members — Terms. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.390.
Duties of the commission. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 498, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 206, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.392.
Powers of commission. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.394.
Executive committee — Meetings. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.396.
Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 45, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

153.398.
Kentucky bicentennial celebration trust fund. [Repealed]

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 206, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.